West Virginia, session 2026, HB4160.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Regulation And Control Of Elections. §3-8-16. Federal Involvement in Elections. (a) Legislative approval will be necessary for the implementation of any federal guidance concerning elections.(b) Legislative approval will be necessary before any new federal funding related to elections can be accepted.(c) State and local agencies will notify the Governor, Secretary of State, and the Legislature when they receive communications from any federal agency regarding elections.